Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1010.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. An Act Passed at the January Session A.D. 1942 entitled “An Act to
Incorporate the Western Coventry Fire District”, as from time to time amended, is hereby further
amended to read as follows:
Section 13. Vote to approve district merger, consolidation, or transition to municipal fire
department or consolidated fire district.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the District shall not be merged, joined, consolidated,
transitioned, or otherwise made a part of a municipal fire department of the Town of Coventry, or
consolidated with any other fire district without an all-day referendum and the affirmative vote of
the electors of the District in support thereof, said vote to be supervised by the Board of Directors.
(b) The all-day referendum shall be called in the same manner as Special Meetings of the
District as set forth in Section 6 hereof.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002784
========